Oklahoma, session 2026, SB724.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 910 of Title 40, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Expanding


Public Sector Career Opportunities Act”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 910.1 of Title 40, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

Req. No. 447 Page 1


A. As used in this act:


1. “Applicant” means any individual seeking gainful employment


from a public employer;


2. “Baseline requirement” means the minimum skills, prior


training, or prior experience necessary to perform the primary


duties of a position;


3. “Postsecondary degree” means an associate’s, bachelor’s, or


postgraduate degree from an accredited institution;


4. “Direct experience” means any verifiable, previous work


experience during which:


a. the applicant’s primary duties were consistent with


the primary duties of the position currently sought,


or


b. the skills necessary to perform the applicant’s


primary duties are transferable to the position


currently sought;


5. “Hiring consideration” means:


a. a decision to move an applicant to a subsequent round


in the hiring process,


b. a decision to include the applicant on a list of


applicants for consideration by another member of the


employer’s team,


c. a decision to offer an applicant an interview,



Req. No. 447 Page 2


d. a decision to promote, retain, increase compensation,


or provide some other benefit to a current employee of


a public employer,


e. an interview held in good faith between the employer


and the applicant, or


f. a final offer of employment; and


6. “Public employer” means any public municipal, county, or


state agency, or division.


B. 1. For all hiring considerations, public employers may not


reject an applicant solely on the basis of the applicant lacking a


postsecondary degree.


2. Public employers shall determine baseline requirements for


applicants for each job posting. Public employers may include:


a. prior direct experience as a baseline requirement, or


b. particular certificates and courses as a baseline


requirement; provided, that a postsecondary degree


shall not be included as a baseline requirement.


3. For hiring considerations, public employers shall follow the


baseline requirements.


C. Public employers are only permitted to require a minimum


educational attainment for a position if the public employer


demonstrates that such educational attainment is necessary for the


position based on specified skills required for the position that


can only be obtained through a certain degree.

Req. No. 447 Page 3


D. 1. As a prerequisite to being exempt under this section,


public employers shall dedicate a portion of the job posting to


substantiating the necessity of a specific postsecondary degree, on


the basis that:


a. the postsecondary degree is the only possible measure


to determine if an applicant possesses specific


skills, or


b. the position requires advanced accreditation or


licensure that is only available to holders of a


specific postsecondary degree.


2. Public employers shall include in their job postings any


tests, training, apprenticeship, or other forms of assessment that


may validate the competencies of a candidate for a position.


3. Public employers substituting experience for a postsecondary


degree may not exceed:


a. two (2) years of direct experience for an associate’s


degree,


b. four (4) years of direct experience for a bachelor’s


degree,


c. six (6) years of direct experience for a master’s


degree,


d. seven (7) years of direct experience for a


professional degree, or



Req. No. 447 Page 4


e. nine (9) years of direct experience for a doctoral


degree.


E. Nothing in this act shall apply to appointments pursuant to


Section 10 of Title 51 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


F. A solicitation of a public employer for any good or service


may not set forth any minimum experience or educational requirement


for proposed contractor personnel in order for a bidder to be


eligible for award of a contract unless the contracting officer


includes in the solicitation a written justification that explains


why the needs of the executive agency cannot be met without any such


requirement and clarifies how the requirement ensures the needs are


met.


G. 1. Public employers shall provide written notice to each


applicant eliminated from hiring consideration that identifies the


reason the applicant did not meet the baseline requirements for the


job posting.


2. Applicants eliminated from hiring consideration who


reasonably believe the decision was based on the applicant’s lack of


a postsecondary degree may appeal this decision to the Office of


Management and Enterprise Services.


3. Any person may report open positions with public employers


in this state that require a postsecondary degree and fail to


include an explanation required in this act.



Req. No. 447 Page 5


4. If the appeal or report is substantial, the Office of


Management and Enterprise Services may require the public employer


to reopen the hiring process, require the public employer to modify


the job posting, and take other actions as necessary to comply with


this act.


H. The Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall


promulgate the rules necessary for the implementation of this act.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-447 MR 1/19/2025 5:42:03 AM





























Req. No. 447 Page 6